North Dakota, session 69, SB2200.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES -
988 CRISIS HOTLINE PROGRAM. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the community health
trust fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $500,000, or so much of the sum
as may be necessary, to the department of health and human services for the purpose of the 988 crisis
hotline program, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.

S. B. NO. 2200 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2200.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 1 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 87 Nays 6 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State